Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5553.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6-13-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 6-13 entitled "Unfair Sales
Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
6-13-1. Definitions.
(a) “Cost to the retailer” means the invoice cost of the merchandise to the retailer within
thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, or the replacement cost of the merchandise to the
retailer within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, in the quantity last purchased, whichever
is lower; less all trade discounts except customary discounts for cash; to which shall be added:
(1) Freight charges not otherwise included in the cost of the merchandise;
(2) Cartage to the retail outlet if performed or paid for by the retailer, which cartage cost
shall be deemed to be three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) of the cost of the merchandise to the
retailer, unless the retailer claims and proves a lower cartage cost; and
(3) A markup to cover in part the cost of doing business, which markup, in the absence of
proof of a lesser cost, shall be six percent (6%) of the total cost at the retail outlet.
(b) “Cost to the wholesaler” means the invoice cost of the merchandise to the wholesaler
within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, or the replacement cost of the merchandise to
the wholesaler within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, in the quantity last purchased,
whichever is lower; less all trade discounts except customary discounts for cash; to which shall be
added:

(1) Freight charges not otherwise included in the cost of the merchandise;
(2) Cartage to the retail outlet if performed or paid for by the wholesaler, which cartage
cost shall be deemed to be three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) of the cost of the merchandise to
the wholesaler, unless the wholesaler claims and proves a lower cartage cost; and
(3) A markup to cover in part the cost of doing business, which markup, in the absence of
proof of a lesser cost, shall be two percent (2%) of the total cost at the wholesale establishment.
(c) Where two (2) or more items are advertised; offered for sale; or sold at a combined
price; the price of each item shall be determined in the manner stated in subsections (a) and (b).
(d) “Sell at retail”, “sales at retail”, and “retail sale” mean and include any transfer of title
to tangible personal property for a valuable consideration made in the ordinary course of trade or
in the usual prosecution of the seller’s business to the purchaser for consumption or use other than
resale or further processing or manufacturing. In this and in the preceding subsection the previous
terms shall include any transfer of property where title is retained by the seller as security for the
payment of the purchase price.
(e) “Retailer” means and includes every person, co-partnership, corporation, or association
engaged in the business of making sales at retail within this state; provided, that, in the case of a
retailer engaged in the business of making sales both at retail and at wholesale, the term shall be
applied only to the retail portion of the business.
(f) “Wholesaler” means and includes every person, partnership, corporation, or association
engaged in the business of making sales at wholesale within this state; provided, that, in the case
of a wholesaler engaged in the business of making sales both at wholesale and at retail, the term
shall be applied only to the wholesale portion of the business.
(g) Whenever any person, partnership, corporation, or association in the course of doing
business performs the functions of both wholesaler and retailer without actually being engaged in
the business of making sales at wholesale, the term “wholesaler” means and includes that function
of the business of preparation for sale at the retail outlet, and the term “retailer” shall be applied
only to the retail portion of the business.
(h) “Household” means and includes those who dwell under the same roof, house, or
apartment.
(i) “Rebate” means a refund of a portion of the purchase price made to consumer to induce
purchase of product.
(j) "Digital coupon" means any store coupon, rebate, or similar instrument presented solely
through the Internet, and only obtainable through a consumer's personal computing device, and that
provides to a consumer a discounted price or benefit, redeemable at the physical location where the
LC001913 - Page 2 of 4

goods or services are being offered for sale.
SECTION 2. Section 6-13-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 6-13 entitled "Unfair Sales
Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
6-13-11. Discount price advertisement.
(a) It shall be unlawful to use, communicate, or publish any advertisement that states that
an item or product is being sold or offered for sale at below the regular price or at a percentage off
the regular price without posting the regular price at the point of purchase.
(b) Whenever an item or product is advertised for sale at below the regular price or at a
percentage off the regular price, the advertisement shall clearly state whether there is an additional
charge for equipment or services that are reasonably necessary for the proper use of the product.
(c) Whenever food and related items, as defined in § 44-18-7.1, are advertised by a retailer
for sale at or below the regular price or at a percentage off the regular price through the redemption
of a digital coupon, the retailers shall provide a purchaser with the ability to obtain the same
discounted price or other benefit offered by the digital coupon through an alternative method not
requiring the use of a personal computing device. Such alternative methods may include, but are
not limited to, paper coupons, electronic kiosks, or application of the discounted price or benefit at
the point-of-sale upon the request of the consumer. Such in-store alternatives shall be readily
available and easily accessible to the consumer, and in the case of electronic kiosks, be prominently
displayed in the store.
(d) Any person, firm, or corporation who or that shall violate the provisions of this section
shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(e) Severability. If any portion of this section is found by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be unlawful, such finding shall not affect any other portion of said section not specifically so
found.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001913
========
LC001913 - Page 3 of 4